Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4765.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15a. "Federal-only voter" means a voter registration applicant whose United States citizenship has not been verified, who is not a registered elector under this act, and who is not entitled to vote in any election other than an election for federal offices. Sec. 493a. (1) Subject to this section, the secretary of state shall automatically register to vote each individual who meets the qualifications of an elector under section 492, who provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, and who submits an application for an operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, an official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. In addition, subject to this section, the secretary of state shall automatically register to vote each individual who meets the qualifications of an elector under section 492, who provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, and who submits a change of address application for an operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, an official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (2) Subject to this subsection, for each individual who submits an application under subsection (1) or who is issued a graduated licensing status under section 310e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310e, who provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, and who is of sufficient age to register to vote, the secretary of state shall, if the individual is not already registered to vote in this state, add the information required under section 509q(1)(a), (b), and (g) to the qualified voter file for that individual and electronically forward the individual's information to the clerk of the city or township in which the individual resides to have the clerk register that individual to vote. For an individual registered to vote under this subsection, the qualified voter file must include an indication that the individual was registered to vote under this section. Subject to this subsection, the secretary of state shall send to the individual's residence address, by nonforwardable mail, a notice that the individual has been registered to vote and a postage prepaid and preaddressed return form by which the individual may decline the voter registration. The secretary of state shall prescribe the form of the notice described in this subsection. In addition, the secretary of state shall develop procedures for processing a voter registration under this subsection for an individual who has previously declined voter registration under subsection (4). (3) The notice mailed to an individual under subsection (2) must include all of the following: (a) An explanation of the eligibility requirements to register to vote, and a statement that if the individual is not eligible to vote, the individual must decline the voter registration by using the postage prepaid and preaddressed return form. (b) A statement that an individual may decline the voter registration. The statement must also indicate that if the individual declines the voter registration, the fact that the individual declined the voter registration remains confidential and can be used only for purposes of voter registration statistics. The statement must also indicate that if the individual remains registered to vote, the office at which the individual was registered to vote remains confidential and can be used only for voter registration purposes. (c) Information on how a registered elector may cast an absent voter ballot. (4) If an individual returns a notice mailed under subsection (2) and declines the voter registration, that individual is considered to never have been registered to vote and any information added to the qualified voter file for that individual must be removed. However, if an individual has voted in an election and then returns a notice mailed under subsection (2) that declines the voter registration, the secretary of state's office shall contact that individual to determine whether the individual wishes to decline the voter registration or remain registered to vote. (5) If a notice mailed under subsection (2) is returned to the secretary of state by the post office as undeliverable, the qualified voter file must generate a notification to the clerk of the city or township in which that individual resides to have the clerk mail the individual a notice required under section 509aa(3). If an individual returns a notice mailed under subsection (2) without selecting the option to decline the voter registration, the individual remains registered to vote. (6) The secretary of state shall not provide an opportunity to register to vote or automatically register to vote any individual who, when submitting an application under subsection (1), provides documentation demonstrating that the individual is not a United States citizen. Subject to this subsection, for any other individual who submits an application under subsection (1) who has not provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, but who is of sufficient age to register to vote, the secretary of state shall offer to register to vote that individual if the individual indicates on the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license application, official state personal identification card application, or change of address application that the individual is a citizen of the United States and if that individual provides documentation demonstrating United States citizenship. The secretary of state shall add the information required under section 509q(1)(a), (b), and (g) to the qualified voter file for each elector registered under this subsection and shall electronically forward the name of each elector registered under this subsection to the clerk of the city or township in which each elector resides to have the clerk register that individual to vote. For an individual registered under this subsection, the qualified voter file must include an indication that the individual was registered to vote under this section. For purposes of this subsection only, the secretary of state shall not register to vote an individual under this subsection who indicates on the individual's operator's or chauffeur's license application, official state personal identification card application, or change of address application that the individual declines to use the application as a voter registration application. The secretary of state shall not transmit any information to the qualified voter file regarding any individual who declines under this subsection to use an application described in this section as a voter registration application. (7) The secretary of state shall use the procedures in subsections (2) to (6) to preregister any individual who meets the qualifications to preregister to vote under section 496a and who submits an application under subsection (1). The procedures in subsections (2) to (5) must be used for each individual who submits an application under subsection (1), or who is issued a graduated licensing status under section 310e of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.310e, who provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, and who is of sufficient age to preregister to vote. The notice and procedures required in subsections (2) to (5) must be modified to reflect that the individual has been preregistered to vote, not registered to vote. The procedures in subsection (6) must be used for each individual who submits an application under subsection (1) and who has not provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, but is of sufficient age to preregister to vote, except that the secretary of state shall not provide an opportunity to preregister to vote or automatically preregister to vote any individual who, at the time of submitting an application under subsection (1), provides documentation demonstrating that the individual is not a United States citizen. (8) An individual who is not eligible to vote and who, without intending to register to vote, becomes registered to vote through human or mechanical error is not considered to have knowingly intended to register to vote in violation of section 519. (9) If an individual who is not eligible to vote becomes registered to vote under subsection (2) or section 493b and votes or attempts to vote in an election held after the effective date of the individual's voter registration, that individual is presumed to have a defense for a violation under section 932a(c). This subsection does not apply to an individual who knowingly and willfully makes a false statement to effectuate voter registration or who intentionally takes voluntary action to register to vote or vote knowing that the individual is not entitled to vote. (10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to amend the substantive qualifications for voter registration in this state. , or to require documentary proof of United States citizenship for voter registration. (11) The secretary of state shall publicly release data reports, as described in this subsection, on a monthly basis. The data reports must not include any personally identifying information, must be subcategorized by sex and age of the individuals included, and must include all of the following information: (a) The number of individuals registered to vote or preregistered to vote under the procedures in subsections (2) to (5). (b) The number of individuals who declined voter registration or voter preregistration under the procedures in subsections (2) to (5). (c) The number of individuals registered to vote or preregistered to vote under the procedures in subsection (6). (d) The number of individuals who declined voter registration or voter preregistration under the procedures in subsection (6). (e) The number of individuals whose voter registration or voter preregistration was updated pursuant to the requirement under sections 509o and 509r that the secretary of state use the residence address provided on a driver license or state personal identification card application as the applicant's residence address in the qualified voter file. Sec. 493b. (1) If the secretary of state verifies that a state agency in the regular course of business collects sufficient information, including through documents or database verification, to confirm the eligibility for voter registration or the updating of information for an existing voter registration, the secretary of state may designate that state agency as an automatic voter registration agency. Once a state agency is designated as an automatic voter registration agency, that state agency must not be removed as an automatic voter registration agency unless it is shown that the state agency no longer collects sufficient information to confirm the eligibility for voter registration or the updating of information for an existing voter registration. (2) If a state agency is designated as an automatic voter registration agency under subsection (1), that state agency and the secretary of state shall jointly establish a procedure and schedule for automatically and electronically transmitting voter registration information from the state agency to the secretary of state for those individuals who are eligible to register to vote or preregister to vote, or to update information in the qualified voter file for those individuals who are already registered to vote or preregistered to vote. Subject to any instructions issued and determined necessary by the secretary of state to conform with a designated state agency transaction, each designated state agency under subsection (1), the secretary of state, and the clerk of each city and township must comply with the procedures under section 493a for automatically registering and preregistering individuals to vote. (3) If information is received under subsection (2) for an individual who is already registered to vote or preregistered to vote, the secretary of state shall use the most recent information for the residence address or name of the individual received from the state agency to update the individual's information in the qualified voter file. The secretary of state shall send to the individual's new residence address, by forwardable mail, notice of the change and a postage prepaid and preaddressed return form by which the individual may verify or correct the information. If the individual returns the notice and indicates that the change to the individual's record was in error, the secretary of state must immediately revert the individual's updated information in the qualified voter file to the information as it existed before the update. (4) Subject to compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations, as part of an application for Medicaid coverage to the department of health and human services, the department of health and human services shall automatically and electronically transmit the information required under section 509q(1)(a), either the information required under section 509q(1)(b) or the last 4 digits of the individual's Social Security number, and the individual's digitized signature, if available, to the secretary of state for each individual who is of sufficient age to register to vote or preregister to vote and who is verified as a United States citizen. Subject to any instructions issued and determined necessary by the secretary of state to conform with the structure of a department of health and human services application, in processing the information received from the department of health and human services under this subsection, the secretary of state and each city or township clerk shall comply with the requirements established under section 493a(2) to (5) and (7) for automatically registering and preregistering individuals to vote, and the requirements established under subsection (3) for updating information for individuals who are already registered to vote or preregistered to vote. (5) Subject to compliance with all applicable federal laws and regulations, an Indian nation or tribe located in this state may, at its discretion, submit a request to the secretary of state for approval to allow the governing body of the Indian nation or tribe, or an election board, election official, or other designated representative of the Indian nation or tribe, to electronically submit the information required under section 509q(1)(a), either the information required under section 509q(1)(b) or the last 4 digits of the individual's Social Security number, and the individual's digitized signature, if available, for any tribal member to the secretary of state for the purpose of registering and preregistering tribal members to vote or for updating the registration or preregistration information of tribal members. If an Indian nation or tribe submits a request under this subsection and the Indian nation's or tribe's governing body, election board, election official, or other designated representative collects sufficient information, including through documents or database verification, to confirm the eligibility for registration or for updating the information for an existing voter registration, the secretary of state shall enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Indian nation or tribe regarding transmission and processing of information for purposes of voter registration. Subject to any instructions issued and determined necessary by the secretary of state to conform with Indian nation or tribal procedures, in processing information received under this subsection, the secretary of state and each city or township clerk shall comply with the requirements established under section 493a(2) to (5) and (7) for automatically registering and preregistering individuals to vote, and the requirements established under subsection (3) for updating information for individuals who are already registered to vote or preregistered to vote. (6) The secretary of state and the department of corrections shall coordinate to ensure that eligible individuals are automatically registered to vote, with the opportunity to decline the voter registration, on release from incarceration imposed as a sentence for a crime. Subject to this subsection, for individuals scheduled to be released on parole, or discharged on completion of the individual's maximum sentence, and who will be issued an operator's or chauffeur's license under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, an official state personal identification card under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308, the secretary of state and the department of corrections shall use the procedures under section 493a(2) to (7) to comply with this subsection. However, an individual must not be registered to vote until the individual's release on parole or discharge on completion of the individual's maximum sentence. The procedures under section 493a(2) to (5) must be used for each individual who submits an application for an operator's or chauffeur's license under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, an official state personal identification card under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, or an enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308, who provides or has provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, and who is of sufficient age to register to vote. The notice and procedures required under section 493a(2) to (5) must be modified to reflect that the individual is not registered to vote until released on parole or discharged on completion of the individual's maximum sentence. Subject to this subsection, the procedures under section 493a(6) must be used for each individual who submits an application for an operator's or chauffeur's license under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an official state personal identification card under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, and who has not provided documentation demonstrating United States citizenship, but and who is of sufficient age to register to vote. However, the secretary of state shall not provide an opportunity to register to vote or automatically register to vote any individual who, at the time of submitting an application for an operator's or chauffeur's license under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an official state personal identification card under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, provides documentation demonstrating that the individual is not a United States citizen. The secretary of state and the department of corrections shall jointly ensure that an individual is not registered to vote under this subsection until the individual has been released on parole or discharged on completion of the individual's maximum sentence. For any individual who is released from incarceration imposed as a sentence for a crime and who is not otherwise subject to this subsection, the department of corrections and the secretary of state shall, as provided under subsection (2), jointly establish a procedure and schedule for automatically and electronically transmitting voter registration information from the department of corrections to the secretary of state for those individuals who are eligible to register or preregister to vote. (7) The secretary of state shall develop procedures for processing electronic records received from a state agency designated as an automatic voter registration agency, or from an Indian nation or tribe under this section, that do not include a digitized image of the applicant's signature. Sec. 495. The voter registration application must contain all of the following: (a) The name of the applicant. (b) The residence address of the applicant, including the street and number or rural route and box number and the apartment number, if any. (c) The city or township and county of residence of the applicant. (d) The date of birth of the applicant. (e) The driver license or state personal identification card number of the applicant, if available. (f) A statement that the applicant is a citizen of the United States. (g) A statement informing the applicant of all of the following: (i) State law requires that an applicant's United States citizenship be verified in order for the applicant to vote in state and local elections. (ii) The secretary of state shall verify the citizenship status of the applicant. (iii) The applicant may expedite the verification of citizenship status by providing to the secretary of state satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship. (h) (g) For voter registration, a statement that the applicant is at the time of completing the affidavit, or will be on the date of the next election, not less than 18 years of age, and for preregistration to vote, a statement that the applicant is at the time of completing the affidavit at least 16 years of age. (i) (h) For voter registration, a statement that the applicant has or will have lived in this state not less than 30 days before the next election, and for preregistration to vote, a statement that the applicant has lived in this state for at least 30 days. (j) (i) For voter registration, a statement that the applicant has or will have established the applicant's residence in the township or city in which the applicant is applying for registration not less than 30 days before the next election, and for preregistration to vote, a statement that the applicant has established the applicant's residence in the township or city in which the applicant is applying for preregistration for at least 30 days. (k) (j) A statement that the applicant must be at least 18 years of age on or before the date of an election to vote in that election. (l) (k) A space in which the applicant must state the place of the applicant's last registration, if any. (m) (l) A statement that the registration is not effective until processed by the clerk of the city or township in which the applicant resides. (n) (m) A statement that the applicant, if qualified, may vote at an election occurring on or after the date of completing the voter registration application. (o) (n) A statement authorizing the cancellation of registration at the applicant's last place of registration. (p) (o) A space for the applicant to sign and certify to the truth of the statements on the application. Sec. 496c. (1) After a voter registration applicant applies to register to vote, the secretary of state shall verify the applicant's citizenship status by using existing databases maintained by the department of state and the United States Department of Homeland Security and by using any other reliable sources. (2) A voter registration applicant may provide satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship to expedite the verification of citizenship status by presenting 1 of the documents listed in this section in person, or by including a photocopy of 1 of the documents listed in this section with the applicant's mailed voter registration application. Satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship includes any of the following documents: (a) The applicant's driver license or personal identification card issued by the department of state or the equivalent department of another state if that department indicates on the applicant's driver license or personal identification card that the individual has provided satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship. (b) The applicant's birth certificate that verifies United States citizenship. The applicant's birth certificate may be accompanied by a marriage license or other documentation that shows a name change. (c) The pertinent pages of the applicant's United States passport identifying the applicant and the applicant's passport number. (d) The applicant's United States naturalization documents or number of the Certificate of Naturalization. (e) The applicant's Certificate of Citizenship. (f) An American Indian Card issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security with the classification "KIC". (g) The applicant's Bureau of Indian Affairs card number, Indian Census Number, tribal treaty card number, or tribal enrollment number. (h) The applicant's Certification of Report of Birth or Consular Report of Birth Abroad. (3) If the secretary of state is unable to verify the citizenship status of a voter registration applicant as provided in this section, all of the following apply: (a) The secretary of state shall notify the applicant that the applicant's citizenship status could not be verified and the applicant must be given an opportunity to provide satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship to the secretary of state. (b) The applicant is not a registered elector under this act or under section 4 of article II of the state constitution of 1963 until the applicant's United States citizenship is verified. (c) The applicant is designated as a federal-only voter in the qualified voter file and is eligible to vote only in elections for federal offices, and is not eligible to vote in state or local elections until the applicant provides satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship to the secretary of state. (4) If the secretary of state receives satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship from a voter registration applicant described under subsection (3), the secretary of state shall immediately register the applicant as a registered elector under this act and remove the federal-only voter designation in the qualified voter file, and that registered elector is eligible to vote in all elections. (5) If any provision of this section is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions of this section that can be given effect without the invalid provision, and to this end the provisions of this section are severable. Sec. 509o. (1) The secretary of state shall direct and supervise the establishment and maintenance of a statewide qualified voter file. The secretary of state shall establish the technology to implement the qualified voter file. The qualified voter file is the official file for the conduct of all elections held in this state. The secretary of state may direct that all or any part of the city or township voter registration files must be used in conjunction with the qualified voter file at the first state primary and election held after the creation of the qualified voter file. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, an individual who appears to vote in an election and whose name appears in the qualified voter file for that city, township, or school district, and who is not designated in the qualified voter file as preregistered to vote as provided under section 496a or who is not designated in the qualified voter file as a federal-only voter as provided under section 509r, is considered a registered elector of that city, township, or school district under this act. (3) The secretary of state, a designated voter registration agency, or a county, city, or township clerk shall not place a name of an individual into the qualified voter file unless that individual signs an application as prescribed in section 509r(3), or is registered to vote or preregistered to vote under section 493a or 493b. The secretary of state or a designated voter registration agency shall not allow an individual to indicate a different address than the address in either the secretary of state's or designated voter registration agency's files to be placed in the qualified voter file. (4) The secretary of state shall develop and utilize a process by which information obtained through the United States Social Security Administration's death master file that is used to cancel an operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923, or an official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300, of a deceased resident of this state is also used at least once a month to update the qualified voter file to cancel the voter registration of any elector determined to be deceased. The secretary of state shall make the canceled voter registration information under this subsection available to the clerk of each county, city, or township to assist with the clerk's obligations under section 510. (5) Subject to this subsection, the secretary of state shall participate with other states in 1 or more recognized multistate programs or services, if available, to assist in the verification of the current residence and voter registration status of electors. The secretary of state shall not participate in any recognized multistate program or service described in this subsection that requires this state to promote or adopt legislation as a condition of participation in that program or service. In addition, the secretary of state shall not participate in any recognized multistate program or service described in this subsection if the secretary of state determines that data of that program or service are not being adequately secured or protected. The secretary of state shall follow the procedures under section 509aa(5) with regard to any electors affected by information obtained through any multistate program or service. Sec. 509q. (1) Subject to subsection (2), the qualified voter file must contain all of the following information for each qualified voter: (a) The name; residence address including house number and street name or rural route and box number, and the apartment number, if any; city; state; zip code; and date of birth. (b) The driver license number or state personal identification card number or similar number issued by a designated voter registration agency. (c) Jurisdictional information including county and city or township; village, if any; metropolitan district, if any; and school district. (d) Precinct numbers and ward numbers, if any. (e) Any other information that the secretary of state determines is necessary to assess the eligibility of qualified electors or to administer voter registration or other aspects of the election process. (f) Voting history for a 5-year period. (g) Before June 30, 2025, the most recent digitized signature of an elector if captured or reproduced by the secretary of state or a county, city, or township clerk from a voter registration application under section 509hh, or captured or reproduced by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307. Beginning June 30, 2025, and subject to section 493b(7), the digitized signatures of an elector if captured or reproduced by the secretary of state or a county, city, or township clerk from a voter registration application under section 509hh, or captured or reproduced by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307. (h) For a federal-only voter, a notation that the individual is not authorized to vote in any election other than an election for federal offices. (2) If a qualified voter is a program participant, as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853, the qualified voter file must also contain the program participant's unique identification number issued by the department of the attorney general. (3) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if a qualified voter is a program participant, as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853, the information contained in the qualified voter file for that program participant, including the program participant's unique identification number issued by the department of the attorney general, is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. The information contained in the qualified voter file for a program participant, as that term is defined in section 3 of the address confidentiality program act, 2020 PA 301, MCL 780.853, may be used by an election official during the normal course of the election official's duties as an election official. (4) Subject to section 509gg, if an individual preregisters to vote under section 496a, the information contained in the qualified voter file for that individual is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, until that individual is 17-1/2 years of age. Sec. 509r. (1) The secretary of state shall establish and maintain the computer system and programs necessary to the operation of the qualified voter file. The secretary of state shall allow each county, city, or township access to the qualified voter file. The county, city, and township clerks shall verify the accuracy of the names and addresses of registered electors in the qualified voter file. (2) Subject to subsection (3), the secretary of state and county, city, and township clerks shall compile the qualified voter file that consists of all qualified electors from the following sources and in the following priority: (a) A driver license or, if there is no driver license, a state personal identification card, including renewals and changes of address with the department of state. (b) An application for benefits or services, including renewals and changes of address, taken by a designated voter registration agency. (c) An application to register to vote taken by a county, city, or township clerk. (3) An Subject to subsection (4), an individual whose name does not otherwise appear in the qualified voter file, or whose name has not been added to the qualified voter file under section 493a or 493b, must be placed in the qualified voter file only if the individual signs under penalty of perjury an application that contains an attestation that the applicant meets all of the following requirements: (a) Is 16 years of age or older. (b) Is a citizen of the United States and this state. (c) Is a resident of the city or township where the individual's street address is located. (4) If the secretary of state is unable to verify the citizenship status of a voter registration applicant as provided under section 496c, the secretary of state must still place the name of that voter registration applicant in the qualified voter file, but must designate that voter registration applicant as a federal-only voter. (5) (4) The secretary of state shall create an inactive voter file. (6) (5) If an elector is sent a notice under section 509aa to confirm the elector's residence information or if an elector does not vote for 6 consecutive years, the secretary of state shall place the registration record of that elector in the inactive voter file. The registration record of that elector must remain in the inactive voter file until 1 of the following occurs: (a) The elector votes at an election. (b) The elector responds to a notice sent under section 509aa. (c) Another voter registration transaction involving that elector occurs. (7) (6) While the registration record of an elector is in the inactive voter file, the elector remains eligible to vote and the elector's name must appear on the precinct voter registration list. (8) (7) If the registration record of an elector is in the inactive voter file because the elector was sent a notice under section 509aa to confirm the elector's residence information and that elector votes at an election by absent voter ballot, that absent voter ballot must be marked in the same manner as a challenged ballot as provided in section 727. Sec. 509gg. (1) Subject to subsection (3), the information described in this subsection that is contained in a registration record is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. The secretary of state, a designated voter registration agency, or a county, city, township, or village clerk shall not release a copy of that portion of a registration record that contains any of the following: (a) The record that an individual declined to register to vote. (b) The office that received a registered elector's application. (c) A registered elector's driver license or state personal identification card number. (d) The month and day of birth of a registered elector. (e) The telephone number provided by a registered elector. (f) The digitized signature of an elector that is captured or reproduced and transmitted to the qualified voter file by the secretary of state or a county, city, or township clerk under section 509hh or by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307. (g) Any satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship provided by the registered elector under section 496c. (h) The citizenship status of the registered elector. (2) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the last 4 digits of a registered elector's Social Security number contained in a registration record are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. The last 4 digits of a registered elector's Social Security number contained in a registration record may only be used by the secretary of state to verify a registered elector's data as provided by the help America vote act of 2002 and to verify a registered elector's status under this act, and must not be used or released for any other purpose. (3) If an individual preregisters to vote under section 496a, the information contained in the registration record for that individual is confidential and not subject to disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, until that individual is 17-1/2 years of age. Once that individual is 17-1/2 years of age, the information contained in the registration record for that individual is subject to the exemptions provided in subsection (1). Sec. 509ii. (1) The secretary of state shall develop and maintain an electronic voter registration interface to allow an applicant to submit a voter registration application electronically through the secretary of state's website. The electronic voter registration interface must do all of the following: (a) Transmit the application to the qualified voter file. (b) Require the applicant's assent to submit the voter registration application electronically. (c) Issue a receipt to the applicant in the manner prescribed by the secretary of state. (d) Utilize security features determined appropriate by the secretary of state or the department of technology, management, and budget to prevent unauthorized access to data or information and to ensure that a person attempting to use the electronic voter registration interface is an individual. (e) Provide an option that allows an applicant to upload satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship for the citizenship verification by the secretary of state as provided under section 496c. The option must clearly indicate to the applicant that uploading satisfactory evidence of United States citizenship on the electronic voter registration interface is not a condition for registering to vote. (2) The secretary of state shall develop an electronic voter registration application that includes all of the same information as provided on the mail registration form developed by the secretary of state under section 509n(a), and that also includes the notice required under section 307(1)(c) of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307. (3) In order to authenticate the identity of a voter registration applicant submitting an electronic voter registration application under this section, the voter registration applicant must provide 1 of the following: (a) The identification number for the applicant on any of the following: (i) A valid operator's or chauffeur's license issued under the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.1 to 257.923. (ii) A valid official state personal identification card issued under 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300. (iii) An enhanced driver license issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (iv) An enhanced official state personal identification card issued under the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.301 to 28.308. (b) If the applicant does not have an identification number for an identification as provided under subdivision (a), the last 4 digits of a valid Social Security number for the applicant. (4) If a voter registration applicant submits a voter registration application under this section that provides an identification number for an identification as provided under subsection (3)(a), the electronic voter registration interface must do all of the following: (a) Interact with the state operator's or chauffeur's license file, enhanced driver license file, official state personal identification card file, and enhanced state personal identification card file for authentication purposes. (b) Authenticate the identity of an applicant under a process developed by the secretary of state that verifies all of the following: (i) The applicant's operator's or chauffeur's license number, enhanced driver license number, official state personal identification card number, or enhanced official state personal identification card number. (ii) The applicant's full name as printed on the applicant's operator's or chauffeur's license, enhanced driver license, official state personal identification card, or enhanced official state personal identification card. (iii) The applicant's date of birth. (iv) The applicant's eye color as printed on the applicant's operator's or chauffeur's license, enhanced driver license, official state personal identification card, or enhanced official state personal identification card. (c) Require the applicant's assent to use the applicant's most recent digitized signature if captured or reproduced by the secretary of state under section 307 of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, MCL 257.307, section 5 of the enhanced driver license and enhanced official state personal identification card act, 2008 PA 23, MCL 28.305, or 1972 PA 222, MCL 28.291 to 28.300. (5) If a voter registration applicant does not have an identification number for an identification as provided under subsection (3)(a), and that voter registration applicant submits a voter registration application under this section that provides the last 4 digits of the applicant's Social Security number, the electronic voter registration interface must do all of the following: (a) Authenticate the identity of the applicant under a process developed by the secretary of state that verifies all of the following information using information maintained by the United States Social Security Administration or the secretary of state: (i) The last 4 digits of the applicant's Social Security number. (ii) The applicant's full name. (iii) The applicant's date of birth. (b) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (6), require the applicant's assent to use the applicant's most recent digitized signature contained in the qualified voter file. (6) If a digitized signature for a voter registration applicant under subsection (5) is not contained in the qualified voter file, the voter registration applicant is required to electronically submit an image of the applicant's signature through the electronic voter registration interface and must assent to the use of this signature image as the applicant's signature for voter registration purposes. The secretary of state shall develop a process for a voter registration applicant under subsection (5) to electronically submit a high-quality digitized image of the applicant's signature through the electronic voter registration interface, as well as a process for transmitting the digitized image of that applicant's signature to the qualified voter file. (7) If an elector utilizes the electronic voter registration interface to indicate a change of address, the state bureau of elections shall send a notice confirming the change to the elector's previous address. (8) A registered elector who wishes to provide a new or additional signature for the registered elector's registration record may utilize the electronic voter registration interface to electronically submit an image of the registered elector's signature and assent to the use of that signature image as the registered elector's signature for voter registration purposes. The registered elector must have the registered elector's identity authenticated under the procedures in subsection (4)(b) or (5)(a) before the image of the registered elector's signature is accepted for inclusion in the qualified voter file. The registered elector shall submit the image of the registered elector's signature using the process developed by the secretary of state under subsection (6).